New York, session 2025-2026, S3167.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Title 7 of the administrative code of the city of New York 2 is amended by adding a new chapter 10 to read as follows: 3 CHAPTER 10 4 EVIDENCE FOR AGENCY SUMMONS 5 § 7-1001 Photographic evidence for agency summons. 1. All city agen- 6 cies issuing summonses that are subject to review by any entity within 7 the office of administrative tribunals and hearings shall review all of 8 the violations for which a summons may be issued to develop a list of 9 violations that can be proven through the use of photographic evidence. 10 2. For any violation appearing on these lists, city agencies shall 11 document such violations by photographic evidence taken at the time of 12 the issuance of a summons. Such photographic evidence may be gathered by 13 using a camera, mobile phone, or any other device capable of producing 14 an electronic picture file. 15 3. When it is either impracticable or impossible for a city agency to 16 document a violation appearing on such lists as prescribed in subdivi- 17 sion two of this section, the issuing agent or officer shall include a 18 statement within the summons explaining why it was impracticable or 19 impossible to do so. 20 4. Photographic evidence shall be included in summons filings made 21 available online at the office of administrative tribunals and hearing's 22 website, allowing a respondent to view the photographic evidence that 23 has been collected against them. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02239-02-5 S. 3167 2 1 5. Agencies shall be authorized to promulgate rules relative to creat- 2 ing procedures for the collection of photographic evidence required by 3 this section. 4 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.